Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.130

Impounding—Notice—Copy to owner.

The brand inspector shall cause to be published once in a newspaper published in the county where the animal was found, a notice of the impounding.

The notice shall state:

(1) A description of the animal, including brand, tattoo or other identifying characteristics;

(2) When and where found;

(3) Where impounded; and

(4) That if unclaimed, the animal will be sold at a public livestock market sale or other public sale, and the date of such sale: PROVIDED, That if no newspaper shall be published in such county, copies of the notice shall be posted at four commonly frequented places therein.

If the animal is marked with a brand or tattoo which is registered with the director of agriculture, the brand inspector, on or before the date of publication or posting, shall send a copy of the notice to the owner of record by registered mail.

[ 1995 c 374 s 69; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 16; 1951 c 31 s 4. Formerly RCW 16.13.040.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 69, 70, and 72-79: "Sections 69, 70, and 72 through 79 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 16, 1995]." [ 1995 c 374 s 82.]